pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Placas de expansão para computadores: Cartões e adaptadores de áudio; Adaptadores e cartões de interface para computador; Riser cards; Placas e adaptadores controladores de armazenamento; Placas e adaptadores para TV; Cartões gráficos e adaptadores de vídeo
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > PC拡張カード: サウンドカード・アダプター; PCインターフェースカード・アダプター; ライザーカード; ストレージコントローラーカード・アダプター; TVチューナーカード・アダプター; ビデオカード & グラフィックボード
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Adaptadores e cartões de E/S: Adaptadores e cartões áudio; Adaptadores e cartões de interface de computador; Cartões riser; Placas e adaptadores controladores de armazenamento; Adaptadores e cartões de sintonizador de TV; Adaptadores e cartões de vídeo
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Schede di espansione per computer: Schede audio; Adattatori e schede di interfaccia per PC; Scheda Riser; Schede e adattatori di controller di archiviazione; Schede sintonizzazione e adattatori TV; Schede video
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Платы расширения: Звуковые карты; Интерфейсные платы для компьютеров; Райзер-платы; Контроллеры хранения данных и адаптеры; Платы для ТВ-тюнеров; Видеокарты
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > I/O-kort og -adaptere: Lydkort og -adaptere; Grænsefladekort- og adaptere til computer; Riser-kort; Lager-controllerkort og -adaptere; Tv-kort og -adaptere; Videokort og -adaptere
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > I/O kartice i adapteri: Audiokartice i adapteri; Kartice i adapteri za računalno sučelje; Riser kartice; Kartice i adapteri za kontroler pohrane; TV kartice i adapteri; Videokartice i adapteri
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Computeruitbreidingskaarten: Audiokaarten; Interfacekaarten en adapters voor computers; Riser-kaarten; Opslagcontroller kaarten en adapters; Kaarten en adapters voor tv-tuners; Videokaarten
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Computer-Steckkarten: Soundkarten; Computer-Steckkarten & -Adapter; Riser-Karten; Speicher-Controller-Karten und -Adapter; TV-Karten und -Adapter; Grafikkarten & Videoadapter
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > I/O karty a adaptéry: Zvukové karty a adaptéry; Karty a adaptéry počítačového rozhrania; Stromčeky; Ovládacie karty a adaptéry úložísk; TV tunerové karty a adaptéry; Video karty a adaptéry
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Bilgisayar Genişletme Kartları: Ses Kartları ve Adaptörleri; Bilgisayar Arabirim Kartları ve Adaptörleri; Riser Kartlar; Depolama Kontroller Kartları ve Adaptörleri; TV Kartları ve Adaptörleri; Ekran Kartları ve Adaptörleri
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Įvesties / išvesties plokštės ir adapteriai: Garso plokštės ir adapteriai; Kompiuterių sąsajos plokštės ir adapteriai; Išplėtimo plokštės; Duomenų kaupiklių valdiklių plokštės ir adapteriai; TV imtuvų plokštės ir adapteriai; Vaizdo plokštės ir adapteriai
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Thẻ đầu vào/đầu ra và bộ điều hợp: Thẻ âm thanh và bộ điều hợp; Thẻ & Bộ chuyển đổi giao diện máy tính; Thẻ mở rộng; Thẻ và bộ chuyển đổi điều khiển lưu trữ; Bộ thu sóng truyền hình cho máy tính; Card màn hình
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > I/O 卡和轉接器: 音效卡; 電腦介面卡/轉接器; 豎卡; 儲存控制卡與轉接器; 電視調諧器/轉接器; 顯示卡和視訊配接器
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > I/O kártyák és adapterek: Hangkártyák és adapterek; Számítógépes interfészkártyák és adapterek; Riser kártyák; Tároló vezérlőkártyák és adapterek; TV-beállító kártyák és adapterek; Videokártyák és adapterek
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > I/O карти и адаптери: Аудиокарти и адаптери; Компютърни интерфейсни карти и адаптери; Рейзър платки; Контролни карти и адаптери за съхранение; ТВ тунер карти и адаптери; Видео карти и адаптери
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > I/O卡与适配器: 声卡/适配器; 计算机接口卡/适配器; 转接卡; 存储控制器卡和适配器; 电视调谐卡与适配器; 显卡
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > I/O-kort och adaptrar: Ljudkort och adaptrar; Gränssnittskort och adaptrar för datorer; Riserkort; Lagringskontrollerkort och adaptrar; TV-kort och adaptrar; Grafikkort och adaptrar
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Vhodno-izhodne kartice in adapterji: Zvočne kartice in adapterji; Kartice in adapterji za računalniške vmesnike; Razširitvene kartice; Krmilne kartice in adapterji za shranjevanje; TV kartice in adapterji; Grafične kartice in adapterji
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 입출력 카드/어댑터: 오디오 카드/어댑터; 컴퓨터 인터페이스 카드/어댑터; 라이저 카드; 스토리지 컨트롤러 카드 및 어댑터; TV 수신 카드/어댑터; 비디오 카드/어댑터
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Karty i adaptery I/O: Karty i adaptery audio; Karty i adaptery do komputerów; Karty riser; Karty kontrolerów pamięci masowej i adaptery; Karty i adaptery telewizyjne; Karty i adaptery wideo
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > I/O-kortit ja -muuntimet: Äänikortit ja -adapterit; Tietokoneen verkkokortit ja muuntimet; Riser-kortit; Tallennusohjauskortti ja -sovitin; TV-kortit ja -muuntimet; Videokortit ja -muuntimet
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > การ์ด I/O และอะแดปเตอร์: การ์ดเสียงและอะแดปเตอร์; การ์ดและอะแดปเตอร์อินเทอร์เฟซของคอมพิวเตอร์; การ์ดไรเซอร์; การ์ดและอะแดปเตอร์ควบคุมพื้นที่จัดเก็บข้อมูล; กล่องแปลงและการ์ดรับสัญญาณทีวี; การ์ดจอและอะแดปเตอร์วิดีโอ
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > I/O-kort og adaptere: Lydkort og adaptere; Grensesnittkort og adaptere for datamaskiner; Riser-kort; Lagringskontrollerkort og -adaptere; TV-tunerkort og -adaptere; Videokort og adaptere
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > I/O Cards & Adapters: Audio Cards & Adapters; Computer Interface Cards & Adapters; Riser Cards; Storage Controller Cards & Adapters; TV Tuner Cards & Adapters; Video Cards & Adapters
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Κάρτες και προσαρμογείς I/O: Κάρτες ήχου & προσαρμογείς; Κάρτες & προσαρμογείς διεπαφής υπολογιστή; Κάρτες ανύψωσης (Riser Cards); Κάρτες και προσαρμογείς ελεγκτή αποθήκευσης; Κάρτες & προσαρμογείς τηλεοπτικού δέκτη; Κάρτες βίντεο & προσαρμογείς
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Tarjetas de expansión para computadoras: Tarjetas de audio; Adaptadores y tarjetas de interfaz de red; Placas hija; Tarjetas controladores de almacenamiento y adaptadores; Adaptadores y tarjetas sintonizadoras de televisión; Tarjetas de vídeo
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Carduri și adaptoare I/O: Carduri și adaptoare audio; Carduri și adaptoare de interfață pentru computer; Carduri de extensie (riser); Plăci și adaptoare controler de stocare; Carduri și adaptoare TV tuner; Carduri și adaptoare video
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Rozšiřující počítačové karty: Zvukové karty; Karty rozhraní a adaptéry pro počítače; Riser karty; Karty a adaptéry pro řízení úložišť; Televizní karty; Grafické karty
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Cartes et adaptateurs d’E/S: Cartes audio et adaptateurs; Cartes et adaptateurs d’interface pour ordinateurs; Cartes riser; Cartes et adaptateurs de contrôleur de stockage; Cartes et adaptateurs TV; Cartes graphiques et adaptateurs vidéo